Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.130

Provisions inconsistent with charters.

Insofar as the provisions of an existing charter of a municipality are inconsistent with this chapter, a municipality may exercise the authority, or any part thereof, granted by this chapter notwithstanding the inconsistent provision of an existing charter.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.130.]